North Carolina, session 2025, HB570.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) This act shall be known as and may be cited as the "Responsible
Firefighting Foam Management Act."
SECTION 1.(b) Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 8. Responsible Firefighting Foam Management Act.
"§ 143-215.104FF. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Class B firefighting foam. – Foams designed for flammable liquid fires.
(2) Fixed system. – A complete installation piped from a central foam supply
source that discharges foam on the flammable liquid hazard through
permanently installed discharge devices.
(3) PFAS chemicals. – Per-fluoroalkyl and poly-fluoroalkyl substances that
include any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing
at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom, and are designed to be fully
functional in Class B firefighting foam.
(4) Testing. – Any calibration, conformance, or fixed system testing of Class B
firefighting foam.
*H570-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Testing facility. – A facility that allows the discharge of Class B firefighting
foam for testing in nonemergency situations.
"§ 143-215.104GG. Prohibition of certain firefighting foams for training, practice, or
testing.
(a) No person, local government, or State agency may discharge for training or practice
purposes Class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals.
(b) No person, local government, or State agency may discharge for testing purposes
Class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals unless otherwise
required by law or an authority having jurisdiction and a testing facility has implemented
appropriate containment, treatment, and disposal measures to prevent releases of Class B
firefighting foam into the environment.
(c) Non-fluorinated training foams, such as synthetic fluorine free foam, or other
non-fluorinated surrogates shall be used for firefighting training, and training shall be conducted
under conditions conducive to the collection of spent foam regardless of foam type.
(d) The Office of the State Fire Marshal may adopt rules to implement this Part."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 570-First Edition